Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-574
Class V school district; school elections; notice; duty of president to give.

For at least ten days prior to an election in a Class V school district, the president of the board of education shall publish his or her proclamation to the legal voters of the school district in at least one daily newspaper of general circulation in the school district, setting forth the time when and place or places where such election will be held and a full and complete statement of the officers, bond proposition, or question of expenditure to be voted on at the election.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 29(1), p. 328;

R.S.1913, § 7036;

C.S.1922, § 6667;

C.S.1929, § 79-2730;

R.S.1943, § 79-2734;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 269, p. 782;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1007.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 327;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 26.